uz.aff
SFX Y 0 dirtirmaganmizda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirmagansanda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirmagansizda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirmagansizlarda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirmaganda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirmaganlarda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirmagandimda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirmagandikda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirmagandingda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirmagandinglarda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirmagandirmanda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirmagandirmizda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirmagandirsanda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirmagandirsizda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirmagandirsizlarda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirmagandirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirmagandirlarda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirmaganmanku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirmaganmizku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirmagansanku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirmagansizku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirmagansizlarku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirmagandiku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirmagandilarku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirmagandimku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirmagandikku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirmagandingku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirmagandinglarku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirmaganku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirmaganlarku . 
SFX Y 0 ganim . 
SFX Y 0 ganimmi . 
SFX Y 0 ganimdir . 
SFX Y 0 ganimda . 
SFX Y 0 ganimdirda . 
SFX Y 0 ganimmikan . 
SFX Y 0 ganimku . 
SFX Y 0 ganing . 
SFX Y 0 ganingmi . 
SFX Y 0 ganingdir . 
SFX Y 0 ganingda . 
SFX Y 0 ganingdirda . 
SFX Y 0 ganingmikan . 
SFX Y 0 ganingku . 
SFX Y 0 gani . 
SFX Y 0 ganimi . 
SFX Y 0 ganidir . 
SFX Y 0 ganida . 
SFX Y 0 ganidirda . 
SFX Y 0 ganimikan . 
SFX Y 0 ganiku . 
SFX Y 0 ganimiz . 
SFX Y 0 ganimizmi . 
SFX Y 0 ganimizdir . 
SFX Y 0 ganimizda . 
SFX Y 0 ganimizdirda . 
SFX Y 0 ganimizmikan . 
SFX Y 0 ganimizku . 
SFX Y 0 ganingiz . 
SFX Y 0 ganingizmi . 
SFX Y 0 ganingizdir . 
SFX Y 0 ganingizda . 
SFX Y 0 ganingizdirda . 
SFX Y 0 ganingizmikan . 
SFX Y 0 ganingizku . 
SFX Y 0 ganlarim . 
SFX Y 0 ganlarimmi . 
SFX Y 0 ganlarimdir . 
SFX Y 0 ganlarimda . 
SFX Y 0 ganlarimdirda . 
SFX Y 0 ganlarimmikan . 
SFX Y 0 ganlarimku . 
SFX Y 0 ganlaring . 
SFX Y 0 ganlaringmi . 
SFX Y 0 ganlaringdir . 
SFX Y 0 ganlaringda . 
SFX Y 0 ganlaringdirda . 
SFX Y 0 ganlaringmikan . 
SFX Y 0 ganlaringku . 
SFX Y 0 ganlari . 
SFX Y 0 ganlarimi . 
SFX Y 0 ganlaridir . 
SFX Y 0 ganlarida . 
SFX Y 0 ganlaridirda . 
SFX Y 0 ganlarimikan . 
SFX Y 0 ganlariku . 
SFX Y 0 ganlarimiz . 
SFX Y 0 ganlarimizmi . 
SFX Y 0 ganlarimizdir . 
SFX Y 0 ganlarimizda . 
SFX Y 0 ganlarimizdirda . 
SFX Y 0 ganlarimizmikan . 
SFX Y 0 ganlarimizku . 
SFX Y 0 ganlaringiz . 
SFX Y 0 ganlaringizmi . 
SFX Y 0 ganlaringizdir . 
SFX Y 0 ganlaringizda . 
SFX Y 0 ganlaringizdirda . 
SFX Y 0 ganlaringizmikan . 
SFX Y 0 ganlaringizku . 
SFX Y 0 maganim . 
SFX Y 0 maganimmi . 
SFX Y 0 maganimdir . 
SFX Y 0 maganimda . 
SFX Y 0 maganimdirda . 
SFX Y 0 maganimmikan . 
SFX Y 0 maganimku . 
SFX Y 0 maganing . 
SFX Y 0 maganingmi . 
SFX Y 0 maganingdir . 
SFX Y 0 maganingda . 
SFX Y 0 maganingdirda . 
SFX Y 0 maganingmikan . 
SFX Y 0 maganingku . 
SFX Y 0 magani . 
SFX Y 0 maganimi . 
SFX Y 0 maganidir . 
SFX Y 0 maganida . 
SFX Y 0 maganidirda . 
SFX Y 0 maganimikan . 
SFX Y 0 maganiku . 
SFX Y 0 maganimiz . 
SFX Y 0 maganimizmi . 
SFX Y 0 maganimizdir . 
SFX Y 0 maganimizda . 
SFX Y 0 maganimizdirda . 
SFX Y 0 maganimizmikan . 
SFX Y 0 maganimizku . 
SFX Y 0 maganingiz . 
SFX Y 0 maganingizmi . 
SFX Y 0 maganingizdir . 
SFX Y 0 maganingizda . 
SFX Y 0 maganingizdirda . 
SFX Y 0 maganingizmikan . 
SFX Y 0 maganingizku . 
SFX Y 0 maganlarim . 
SFX Y 0 maganlarimmi . 
SFX Y 0 maganlarimdir . 
SFX Y 0 maganlarimda . 
SFX Y 0 maganlarimdirda . 
SFX Y 0 maganlarimmikan . 
SFX Y 0 maganlarimku . 
SFX Y 0 maganlaring . 
SFX Y 0 maganlaringmi . 
SFX Y 0 maganlaringdir . 
SFX Y 0 maganlaringda . 
SFX Y 0 maganlaringdirda . 
SFX Y 0 maganlaringmikan . 
SFX Y 0 maganlaringku . 
SFX Y 0 maganlari . 
SFX Y 0 maganlarimi . 
SFX Y 0 maganlaridir . 
SFX Y 0 maganlarida . 
SFX Y 0 maganlaridirda . 
SFX Y 0 maganlarimikan . 
SFX Y 0 maganlariku . 
SFX Y 0 maganlarimiz . 
SFX Y 0 maganlarimizmi . 
SFX Y 0 maganlarimizdir . 
SFX Y 0 maganlarimizda . 
SFX Y 0 maganlarimizdirda . 
SFX Y 0 maganlarimizmikan . 
SFX Y 0 maganlarimizku . 
SFX Y 0 maganlaringiz . 
SFX Y 0 maganlaringizmi . 
SFX Y 0 maganlaringizdir . 
SFX Y 0 maganlaringizda . 
SFX Y 0 maganlaringizdirda . 
SFX Y 0 maganlaringizmikan . 
SFX Y 0 maganlaringizku . 
SFX Y 0 inganim . 
SFX Y 0 inganimmi . 
SFX Y 0 inganimdir . 
SFX Y 0 inganimda . 
SFX Y 0 inganimdirda . 
SFX Y 0 inganimmikan . 
SFX Y 0 inganimku . 
SFX Y 0 inganing . 
SFX Y 0 inganingmi . 
SFX Y 0 inganingdir . 
SFX Y 0 inganingda . 
SFX Y 0 inganingdirda . 
SFX Y 0 inganingmikan . 
SFX Y 0 inganingku . 
SFX Y 0 ingani . 
SFX Y 0 inganimi . 
SFX Y 0 inganidir . 
SFX Y 0 inganida . 
SFX Y 0 inganidirda . 
SFX Y 0 inganimikan . 
SFX Y 0 inganiku . 
SFX Y 0 inganimiz . 
SFX Y 0 inganimizmi . 
SFX Y 0 inganimizdir . 
SFX Y 0 inganimizda . 
SFX Y 0 inganimizdirda . 
SFX Y 0 inganimizmikan . 
SFX Y 0 inganimizku . 
SFX Y 0 inganingiz . 
SFX Y 0 inganingizmi . 
SFX Y 0 inganingizdir . 
SFX Y 0 inganingizda . 
SFX Y 0 inganingizdirda . 
SFX Y 0 inganingizmikan . 
SFX Y 0 inganingizku . 
SFX Y 0 inganlarim . 
SFX Y 0 inganlarimmi . 
SFX Y 0 inganlarimdir . 
SFX Y 0 inganlarimda . 
SFX Y 0 inganlarimdirda . 
SFX Y 0 inganlarimmikan . 
SFX Y 0 inganlarimku . 
SFX Y 0 inganlaring . 
SFX Y 0 inganlaringmi . 
SFX Y 0 inganlaringdir . 
SFX Y 0 inganlaringda . 
SFX Y 0 inganlaringdirda . 
SFX Y 0 inganlaringmikan . 
SFX Y 0 inganlaringku . 
SFX Y 0 inganlari . 
SFX Y 0 inganlarimi . 
SFX Y 0 inganlaridir . 
SFX Y 0 inganlarida . 
SFX Y 0 inganlaridirda . 
SFX Y 0 inganlarimikan . 
SFX Y 0 inganlariku . 
SFX Y 0 inganlarimiz . 
SFX Y 0 inganlarimizmi . 
SFX Y 0 inganlarimizdir . 
SFX Y 0 inganlarimizda . 
SFX Y 0 inganlarimizdirda . 
SFX Y 0 inganlarimizmikan . 
SFX Y 0 inganlarimizku . 
SFX Y 0 inganlaringiz . 
SFX Y 0 inganlaringizmi . 
SFX Y 0 inganlaringizdir . 
SFX Y 0 inganlaringizda . 
SFX Y 0 inganlaringizdirda . 
SFX Y 0 inganlaringizmikan . 
SFX Y 0 inganlaringizku . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganim . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganimmi . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganimdir . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganimda . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganimdirda . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganimmikan . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganimku . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganing . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganingmi . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganingdir . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganingda . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganingdirda . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganingmikan . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganingku . 
SFX Y 0 inmagani . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganimi . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganidir . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganida . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganidirda . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganimikan . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganiku . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganimiz . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganimizmi . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganimizdir . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganimizda . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganimizdirda . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganimizmikan . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganimizku . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganingiz . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganingizmi . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganingizdir . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganingizda . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganingizdirda . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganingizmikan . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganingizku . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlarim . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlarimmi . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlarimdir . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlarimda . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlarimdirda . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlarimmikan . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlarimku . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlaring . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlaringmi . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlaringdir . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlaringda . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlaringdirda . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlaringmikan . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlaringku . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlari . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlarimi . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlaridir . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlarida . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlaridirda . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlarimikan . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlariku . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlarimiz . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlarimizmi . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlarimizdir . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlarimizda . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlarimizdirda . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlarimizmikan . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlarimizku . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlaringiz . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlaringizmi . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlaringizdir . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlaringizda . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlaringizdirda . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlaringizmikan . 
SFX Y 0 inmaganlaringizku . 
SFX Y 0 ishganim . 
SFX Y 0 ishganimmi . 
SFX Y 0 ishganimdir . 
SFX Y 0 ishganimda . 
SFX Y 0 ishganimdirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishganimmikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishganimku . 
SFX Y 0 ishganing . 
SFX Y 0 ishganingmi . 
SFX Y 0 ishganingdir . 
SFX Y 0 ishganingda . 
SFX Y 0 ishganingdirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishganingmikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishganingku . 
SFX Y 0 ishgani . 
