uz.dic
abjirlash/Y
avtomatlash/Y
ag’nash/Y
ajabsin/Y
ajrimlan/Y
ayyorlan/Y
aylantirish/Y
ayrishtir/Y
aqllash/Y
aldanmoq/Y
alish/Y
aloqalantir/Y
anglat/Y
aniqlan/Y
arazlash/Y
arillat/Y
arralat/Y
archil/Y
asoslantiril/Y
astarlash/Y
atroflat/Y
achintir/Y
achchiqlantir/Y
badavlatlash/Y
badhollan/Y
baybaylat/Y
balandlat/Y
baravarlashtir/Y
basitlantir/Y
baholan/Y
bachkilat/Y
bedorlan/Y
bezatish/Y
bezdir/Y
bekil/Y
beqaydlash/Y
bemazalash/Y
berkil/Y
ber/Y
betamizlash/Y
betlat/Y
befarosatlash/Y
big’illash/Y
biqintir/Y
bilanglash/Y
biliqsit/Y
bil/Y
birkitil/Y
bitishtiril/Y
bichir/Y
bog’latmoq/Y
boqqizdir/Y
bolg’alan/Y
borg’izdir/Y
bosish/Y
botirlan/Y
boshqalan/Y
boshlattiril/Y
bo’g’izlat/Y
bug’lat/Y
bo’jmaytir/Y
bo’zdir/Y
bo’zrayish/Y
bo’ychanlash/Y
buklan/Y
bo’ktar/Y
bulg’alan/Y
bo’ldirtir/Y
bo’l/Y
buratil/Y
bo’riq/Y
bo’rlat/Y
burrolan/Y
burchaklan/Y
bo’shal/Y
buyurtiril/Y
vadirlat/Y
vang’illat/Y
vidolash/Y
gavdalantir/Y
gapiraver/Y
gezartpr/Y
gmaroqlantiril/Y
gullatil/Y
gurkurash/Y
dadillash/Y
damlat/Y
dastaklat/Y
denafikatsiyalan/Y
dilbarlash/Y
distillyatsnyalan/Y
dramalashtir/Y
do’loblash/Y
do’ray/Y
yovuzlashish/Y
yog’ol/Y
yozdiril/Y
yoyish/Y
yolg’izlan/Y
yelpit/Y
yengillashtir/Y
yopishtiril/Y
yerlashtir/Y
yetkazdir/Y
yechil/Y
jabduklan/Y
jamgartir/Y
jiddiylash/Y
jilmay/Y
jihozlantir/Y
jo’nal/Y
zavqlantir/Y
zararlaptir/Y
zidlash/Y
zkish/Y
zo’riq/Y
izzatlan/Y
yig’ish/Y
iylat/Y
yit/Y
ilgarilash/Y
ilintir/Y
ingrash/Y
inon/Y
irvaytir/Y
isin/Y
istal/Y
yo’yil/Y
yundir/Y
ixtisoslan/Y
ichkiz/Y
ishlatil/Y
kavlashtir/Y
kalsiylan/Y
karillat/Y
kezdirtir/Y
kelol/Y
kerishtir/Y
ketkaz/Y
kechlattir/Y
kilkillat/Y
kirlan/Y
koagulyatsiyalan/Y
kontuziyalan/Y
ko’zlan/Y
kulish/Y
ko’nikish/Y
ko’pchitil/Y
ko’rishtir/Y
ko’tartiril/Y
kuchlan/Y
qabnhlan/Y
qadrlan/Y
qayirtir/Y
qaytaril/Y
qalaylattir/Y
qaltislan/Y
qanotlan/Y
qarindoshlash/Y
qatirlat/Y
qahrlan/Y
qizartir/Y
qiigirlash/Y
qiynatil/Y
qilichlash/Y
qimmatlan/Y
qirqtir/Y
qisqartiril/Y
qichishtir/Y
qovurish/Y
qo’yil/Y
qo’nqayish/Y
qurillat/Y
qurolsizlantir/Y
quturt/Y
lablan/Y
lapanglat/Y
loyqalantir/Y
lo’killash/Y
mazalan/Y
maqtanil/Y
mashinalash/Y
mexanizatsiyalantir/Y
milliylashtir/Y
misknnlash/Y
moslash/Y
mug’ayt/Y
mukammallashtnr/Y
mumlat/Y
muhrlan/Y
namiq/Y
na’llat/Y
nishlan/Y
norizolan/Y
obdirash/Y
ovun/Y
og’rin/Y
ozayt/Y
oqiz/Y
olimlash/Y
olnftalash/Y
opichtir/Y
ortil/Y
otqiz/Y
och/Y
payvandlan/Y
parmalat/Y
pechatlattir/Y
pishiq/Y
poylatqiz/Y
po’killat/Y
ravnaqlan/Y
ranglan/Y
rejalashtir/Y
ruhsizlantir/Y
sayrat/Y
sanqn/Y
sarosimalan/Y
sevmoq/Y
sepeit/Y
sig’dirtir/Y
siylash/Y
simsyuniyalashtir/Y
sipqar/Y
sit/Y
sog’inish/Y
solish/Y
sochish/Y
sug’urish/Y
suz/Y
suqishtir/Y
suluvlan/Y
so’rg’ichlat/Y
surkanish/Y
sustlash/Y
suyantir/Y
tajanglash/Y
takomillashtir/Y
taqin/Y
tamaddunlash/Y
tanishtiril/Y
taraqlash/Y
tasdiqlan/Y
taxminlat/Y
ta’birlash/Y
tebrattir/Y
tezlatil/Y
temirlash/Y
teranlashtiril/Y
teshil/Y
tiyil/Y
tiktirtir/Y
tilin/Y
tinglash/Y
tinchsizlan/Y
tirillat/Y
tirsillat/Y
titrat/Y
tovuslan/Y
toq/Y
tomchilantir/Y
toptir/Y
tortqilash/Y
tugallat/Y
tuzal/Y
tuzlan/Y
to’ylash/Y
to’qit/Y
to’lg’azish/Y
to’lqinlantir/Y
to’nkar/Y
to’poslan/Y
to’rsay/Y
tutat/Y
tuflat/Y
tushovlat/Y
uvoqlat/Y
uzayish/Y
o’zdir/Y
uzoqlashtir/Y
uyiltir/Y
o’ynattir/Y
o’qil/Y
ulat/Y
o’loqtir/Y
ung’aylash/Y
unuttir/Y
o’rattiril/Y
o’ril/Y
ur/Y
urchitil/Y
o’tirg’iz/Y
o’tqazish/Y
o’troqlashtiril/Y
o’chiril/Y
uchratil/Y
uyur/Y
faxrlantir/Y
xasislan/Y
xillash/Y
xixlat/Y
xotirlat/Y
xo’rlash/Y
sementlat/Y
chayqalish/Y
chaqillat/Y
chaqchaqlash/Y
chalmashtiril/Y
chapanilash/Y
chatil/Y
chekin/Y
chetlatil/Y
chizdiril/Y
chikirlat/Y
chil/Y
chiriqlat/Y
chirsillash/Y
chopqilat/Y
chuvash/Y
cho’zg’ilash/Y
cho’kkalat/Y
chuqurlashtir/Y
cho’nqayt/Y
chuchmallash/Y
shaylan/Y
shamollan/Y
sheriklash/Y
shiliqlat/Y
shimit/Y
shirqirag/Y
shovurlat/Y
shoshir/Y
sho’mg’it/Y
evil/Y
egdir/Y
eyovlash/Y
eyratil/Y
eksaltir/Y
elan/Y
elektrlashtir/Y
elpayish/Y
emaloqlan/Y
emish/Y
epantir/Y
erkalan/Y
etdir/Y
yumshatil/Y
yuritil/Y
yangilan/Y
yarash/Y
yasattir/Y
yashillan/Y
